District of Columbia statutes.
21-156

Lease of infant’s estate.

Where it appears to the court that it will be to the advantage of the infant that his real estate be demised, the court shall decree that it be demised for a term of years not to exceed the minority of the infant, yielding such rents and on such terms and conditions as the court directs. Where the infant is entitled to only a part of the estate, the decree demising the estate shall be made only if all the owners of the other interest assent.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 743, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-156.
1973 Ed., § 21-156.